West Virginia, session 2025, HB2456.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 66. Support for Mothers and Babies Act. §16-66-2. Establishing the West Virginia Mothers and Babies Pregnancy Support Program. (a) There is hereby established the West Virginia Mothers and Babies Pregnancy Support Program under the Bureau for Public Health.  (b) A pregnancy help organization is eligible to receive funding from the program, subject to meeting the standards defined by the managing agency.(c) An abortion industry organization may not receive funding from the program. (d) (1) The program’s funds may be distributed to pregnancy help organizations eligible under this article for the following reasons:(A) Capital expenditures;(B) Expenditures associated with adding additional services;(C) Expenditures associated with meeting the requirements established by relevant licensing, accreditation, or standards setting organizations; and(D) Training expenditures for pregnancy help organization staff and volunteers.(2) Except as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection,  Funds funds distributed under the program shall be distributed on a fee per service arrangement with a fee per service and hour arrangement as set by the management agency. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home